Arkansas, session 2025, HB1463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 97, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-97-106. Disclosure of neuropsychological or psychological test
materials or test data — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Neuropsychological evaluation" means a testing method
through which a neuropsychologist or a psychologist can acquire data about a
person's cognitive, behavioral, and emotional functioning for purposes of
diagnosing or confirming a diagnosis of cognitive deficiencies or
abnormalities in the central nervous system;
(2) "Neuropsychological or psychological test data" means raw
and scaled scores, a person's responses to test questions or stimuli, a
neuropsychologist's or psychologist's notes and recordings concerning the
person's statements and behavior during a neuropsychological evaluation or
psychological evaluation, and the portions of neuropsychological or
psychological test materials that include the person's responses;
*JMB199*
02-24-2025 10:01:55 JMB199

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1463
(3) "Neuropsychological or psychological test materials" means
manuals, instruments, protocols, assessment devices, scoring keys, test
questions, and stimuli used in conducting a neuropsychological evaluation or
psychological evaluation; and
(4) "Psychological evaluation" means a testing method through
which a psychologist can acquire data about a person's cognitive and
emotional functioning for purposes of determining cognitive ability,
diagnosing a mental health condition, or confirming a mental health
diagnosis.
(b)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(2) and subsection (c)
of this section, neuropsychological or psychological test materials shall not
be disclosed to anyone, including the person who is the subject of the test,
and are not subject to disclosure in any administrative, judicial, or
legislative proceeding.
(2) A neuropsychologist or psychologist is not prohibited from
offering a third party his or her testimony, expert testimony, written
reports, or written communications, or any combination, based on his or her
review of the neuropsychological or psychological test materials.
(c)(1) A person who is the subject of a neuropsychological evaluation
or psychological evaluation may have all records relating to that evaluation,
including neuropsychological or psychological test materials and
neuropsychological or psychological test data, disclosed to any
neuropsychologist or psychologist who is qualified to evaluate the test
results and who is designated by the person to evaluate the test results.
(2) A neuropsychologist or psychologist designated to receive
records under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall not disclose the
neuropsychological or psychological test materials to another person.
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(3) of this section, to
ensure test security, a third-party observer shall not be present during the
administration of psychological or neuropsychological tests.
(2) A third-party observer includes without limitation a family
member, attorney, and insurance representative.
(3) Subdivision (d)(1) of this section does not apply if:
(A) The individual being tested has requested and received
an accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as
amended, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., to have an aide present;
02-24-2025 10:01:55 JMB199

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1463
(B) The individual does not adequately speak the language
in which the test is formatted and requires a professional language
interpreter;
(C) The individual is a minor and the third-party
observer’s presence is deemed necessary and appropriate by the examining
licensed psychologist or other licensee who is properly trained in test
administration and interpretation to facilitate the testing process;
(D) The individual is being observed by a licensed psychologist or
other licensee who is properly trained in test administration and
interpretation to facilitate the supervision of a trainee;
(E) The individual or the circumstances present a
legitimate safety concern and the third-party observer is a security guard or
law enforcement officer; or
(F)(i) The individual and the neuropsychologist or
psychologist consent to an unmanned, unobtrusive camera, video recording
device, or audio recording device that does not interfere with the
neuropsychological evaluation or psychological evaluation.
(ii) A recording made under subdivision (d)(3)(F)(i)
of this section may be provided to a neuropsychologist or psychologist or
under a protective order.
(4)(A) The Attorney General’s office shall retain its
investigatory and subpoena powers under § 5-28-107, § 5-55-104, § 5-55-114, §
20-77-901 et seq., and § 25-16-705.
(B) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall retain its
investigatory and subpoena powers under § 17-95-304.
(C) The Arkansas Psychology Board shall retain its
investigatory powers under § 17-97-311.
(D) The Attorney General’s office, the Arkansas State
Medical Board, and the Arkansas Psychology Board shall be able to access and
use any records obtained that would otherwise be subject to subsection (b) of
this section in any legal, administrative, or judicial proceeding.

/s/Hudson



02-24-2025 10:01:55 JMB199